Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.920

Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 826.]